Colorado statutes. TITLE 1 Elections
PART 12
PRESIDENTIAL PRIMARY ELECTIONS

1-4-1201. Declaration.

In recreating and reenacting this part 12, it is the intent of the People of the State of Colorado that the provisions of this part 12 conform to the requirements of federal law and national political party rules governing presidential primary elections, and that the Colorado General Assembly will, during the 2017 legislative session, adopt all necessary conforming amendments to ensure the proper operation of a presidential primary election in Colorado.

Source:

Initiated 2016:

Entire part RC&RE, Proposition 107, effective upon proclamation of the Governor, December 27, 2016. See L. 2017, p. 2816.

1-4-1202. Definitions.

As used in this part 12, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Political party" means a major political party as defined in section 1-1-104 (22).

"Presidential primary election" means a primary election conducted in a year in which a United States Presidential Election will be held to allocate delegates to national nominating conventions of the major political parties selected in accordance with section 1-4-701.

Source:

Initiated 2016:

Entire part RC&RE, Proposition 107, effective upon proclamation of the Governor, December 27, 2016. See L. 2017, p. 2816.

1-4-1203. Presidential primary elections - when - conduct.

A presidential primary election shall be held on a Tuesday on a date designated by the governor. The date selected for the primary must be no earlier than the date the national rules of the major political parties provide for state delegations to the party's national convention to be allocated without penalty and not later than the third Tuesday in March in years in which a United States Presidential Election will be held. The governor shall, in consultation with the secretary of state, designate the date of the presidential primary election no later than the first day of September in the year before the presidential primary election will be held.

Except as provided for in subsection (5) of this section, each political party that has a qualified candidate entitled to participate in the presidential primary election pursuant to this section is entitled to participate in the Colorado presidential primary election. At the presidential primary election, an elector that is affiliated with a political party may vote only for a candidate of that political party.

An unaffiliated eligible elector may vote in a political party's presidential primary election without affiliating with that party or may declare an affiliation with a political party to the election judges at the presidential primary election in accordance with section 1-7-201. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no elector affiliated with a major or minor political party or political organization may change or withdraw his or her affiliation in order to vote in the presidential primary election of another political party unless the elector has changed or withdrawn such affiliation no later than the twenty-second day preceding the presidential primary election as provided in section 1-2-219 (1).

Except as otherwise provided in this part 12, a presidential primary election must be conducted in the same manner as any other primary election to the extent statutory provisions governing other primary elections are applicable to this part 12. The election officers and county clerk and recorders have the same powers and shall perform the same duties for presidential primary elections as they provide by law for other primary elections and general elections.

A ballot used in a presidential primary election must only contain the names of candidates for the office of the president of the United States of America. The ballot shall not be used for the purpose of presenting any other issue or question to the electorate unless expressly authorized by law.

Each political party that is entitled to participate in the presidential primary election shall have a separate party ballot for use by electors affiliated with that political party.

The county clerk and recorder shall send to all active electors in the county who have not declared an affiliation or provided a ballot preference with a political party a ballot packet that contains the ballots of all the major political parties. In this ballot packet, the clerk shall also provide written instructions advising the elector of the manner in which the elector will be in compliance with the requirements of this code in selecting and casting the ballot of a major political party. An elector may cast the ballot of only one major political party. After selecting and casting a ballot of a single major political party, the elector shall return the ballot to the clerk. If an elector casts and returns to the clerk the ballot of more than one major political party, all such ballots returned will be rejected and will not be counted.

The secretary of state may by rule adopt additional ballot requirements necessary to avoid voter confusion in voting in presidential primary elections.

If, at the close of business on the sixtieth day before a presidential primary election, every political party has no more than one candidate for president affiliated with the political party who is certified to the presidential primary ballot pursuant to section 1-4-1204 (1) or who has filed a write-in candidate statement of intent pursuant to section 1-4-1205, the secretary of state may cancel the presidential primary election for all political parties and declare the candidate for each political party the winner of the presidential primary election for that political party.

The secretary of state may by rule adopt additional ballot requirements necessary to avoid voter confusion in voting in presidential primary elections.

Repealed.

Source:

Initiated 2016:

Entire part RC&RE, Proposition 107, effective upon proclamation of the Governor, December 27, 2016. See L. 2017, p. 2816.

L. 2017:

(1) and (4)(b) amended, (4)(c) and (4)(d) added, and (7) repealed, (SB 17-305), ch. 216, p. 842, § 3, effective August 9.

L. 2021:

(2)(b) and (5) amended, (SB 21-250), ch. 282, p. 1643, § 25, effective June 21.

1-4-1204. Names on ballots.

Not later than sixty days before the presidential primary election, the secretary of state shall certify the names and party affiliations of the candidates to be placed on any presidential primary election ballots. The only candidates whose names shall be placed on ballots for the election shall be those candidates who:

Repealed.

Are seeking the nomination for president of a political party as a bona fide candidate for president of the United States pursuant to political party rules and are affiliated with a major political party that received at least twenty percent of the votes cast by eligible electors in Colorado at the last presidential election; and

Have submitted to the secretary, not later than eighty-five days before the date of the presidential primary election, a notarized candidate's statement of intent together with either a nonrefundable filing fee of five hundred dollars or a petition signed by at least five thousand eligible electors affiliated with the candidate's political party who reside in the state. Candidate petitions must meet the requirements of parts 8 and 9 of this article 4, as applicable.

(1.5) No later than the sixty-fifth day before the presidential primary election, a person whose name has been qualified to be placed on the ballot may file with the secretary of state an affidavit stating that the person is not a candidate for the office of the president of the United States and requesting that the person's name not be included in the list of names certified by the secretary of state in accordance with subsection (1) of this section. The secretary of state shall not include in the list the name of a person who timely files an affidavit.

The names of candidates appearing on any presidential primary ballot must be in an order determined by lot. The secretary of state shall determine the method of drawing lots.

Except as otherwise prohibited by political party rules, the state chairperson of a political party may request the secretary to provide a place on the primary ballot for electors who have no presidential candidate preference to register a vote to send a noncommitted delegate to the political party's national convention. To be valid, this request must be received by the secretary of state no later than seventy days before the presidential primary election.

Any challenge to the listing of any candidate on the presidential primary election ballot must be made in writing and filed with the district court in accordance with section 1-1-113 (1) no later than five days after the filing deadline for candidates. Any such challenge must provide notice in a summary manner of an alleged impropriety that gives rise to the complaint. No later than five days after the challenge is filed, a hearing must be held at which time the district court shall hear the challenge and assess the validity of all alleged improprieties. The district court shall issue findings of fact and conclusions of law no later than forty-eight hours after the hearing. The party filing the challenge has the burden to sustain the challenge by a preponderance of the evidence. Any order entered by the district court may be reviewed in accordance with section 1-1-113 (3).

Source:

Initiated 2016:

Entire part RC&RE, Proposition 107, effective upon proclamation of the Governor, December 27, 2016. See L. 2017, p. 2818.

L. 2017:

(1)(c) and (4) amended, (SB 17-305), ch. 216, p. 843, § 4, effective August 9.

L. 2019:

(1)(a) repealed and (1.5) added, (HB 19-1278), ch. 326, p. 3019, § 26, effective August 2.

Cross references:

For the short title ("Colorado Votes Act") in HB 19-1278, see section 1 of chapter 326, Session Laws of Colorado 2019.

1-4-1205. Write-in candidate affidavit for presidential primary.

A write-in vote for any candidate on the presidential primary ballot shall not be counted unless the candidate for whom the write-in vote was cast has filed a notarized candidate's statement of intent to seek the office of president of the United States. Any such affidavit must be accompanied by a nonrefundable fee of five hundred dollars and must be filed with the secretary of state no later than the close of business on the sixty-seventh day before the presidential primary election.

Source:

Initiated 2016:

Entire part RC&RE, Proposition 107, effective upon proclamation of the Governor, December 27, 2016. See L. 2017, p. 2819.

1-4-1206. Presidential primary ballots - survey of returns.

Each county clerk and recorder shall survey all returns received from the presidential primary election in all county precincts in accordance with article 10 of this title 1. For counties that contain more than one United States congressional district, the returns must indicate the number of votes cast in each precinct for each candidate; except that, if the total number of votes cast and counted in any precinct is less than ten, the returns for all such precincts in the county must be reported together. For counties that contain only one United States congressional district, the returns may indicate the number of votes cast in the county for each candidate.

Source:

Initiated 2016:

Entire part RC&RE, Proposition 107, effective upon proclamation of the Governor, December 27, 2016. See L. 2017, p. 2819.

L. 2019:

Entire section amended, (HB 19-1278), ch. 326, p. 3019, § 27, effective August 2.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (SB 21-250), ch. 282, p. 1643, § 26, effective June 21.

Cross references:

For the short title ("Colorado Votes Act") in HB 19-1278, see section 1 of chapter 326, Session Laws of Colorado 2019.

1-4-1207. Election results - certification - pledging of delegates.

The secretary shall compile the number of votes cast for each candidate named on the presidential primary election ballot and the votes cast to send a noncommitted delegate to the political party's national convention, if applicable, and shall calculate the percentage of votes received by each candidate as compared to the number of votes received by all candidates of the same political party.

The secretary shall certify the results and percentages calculated pursuant to subsection (1) of this section to the state chairperson and the national committee of each political party which had at least one candidate on its presidential primary election ballot.

Each political party shall use the results of the election to allocate national delegate votes in accordance with the party's state and national rules.

Source:

Initiated 2016:

Entire part RC&RE, Proposition 107, effective upon proclamation of the Governor, December 27, 2016. See L. 2017, p. 2819.

L. 2019:

(2) and (3) amended, (HB 19-1278), ch. 326, p. 3020, § 28, effective August 2.

Cross references:

For the short title ("Colorado Votes Act") in HB 19-1278, see section 1 of chapter 326, Session Laws of Colorado 2019.